apertium-eng.eng.dix
<pardef n="one__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="two__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>hundred</l><r><b/>hundred<s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>thousand</l><r><b/>thousand<s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="million__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="twenty__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-one</l>      <r>-one</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-two</l>      <r>-two</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-three</l>    <r>-three</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-four</l>     <r>-four</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-five</l>     <r>-five</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-six</l>      <r>-six</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-seven</l>    <r>-seven</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-eight</l>    <r>-eight</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-nine</l>     <r>-nine</r></p><par n="two__num"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="want__vbmod">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="must__vbmod">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/must__vbmod">
  <e>       <p><l>must</l>      <r>must<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>must</l>      <r>must<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>must</l>      <r>must<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>have<b/>to</l><r>must<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>has<b/>to</l> <r>must<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>had<b/>to</l> <r>must<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="w/ill__vbmod">
  <e>       <p><l>ill</l>       <r>ill<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ill</l>       <r>ill<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ill</l>       <r>ill<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ilt</l>       <r>ill<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ould</l>      <r>ill<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ouldst</l>    <r>ill<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ould</l>      <r>ill<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sh/all__vbmod">
  <e>       <p><l>all</l>       <r>all<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>all</l>       <r>all<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>all</l>       <r>all<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>alt</l>       <r>all<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ould</l>      <r>all<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ould</l>      <r>all<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="c/an__vbmod">
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>an<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>an</l>        <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>an<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>anst</l>      <r>an<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ould</l>      <r>an<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ouldst</l>    <r>an<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ould</l>      <r>an<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/be_able_to__vbmod">
  <e>       <p><l>be<b/>able<b/>to</l><r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>been<b/>able<b/>to</l><r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>being<b/>able<b/>to</l><r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>being<b/>able<b/>to</l><r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>being<b/>able<b/>to</l><r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>am<b/>able<b/>to</l><r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>are<b/>able<b/>to</l><r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is<b/>able<b/>to</l><r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>was<b/>able<b/>to</l><r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>were<b/>able<b/>to</l><r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>was<b/>able<b/>to</l><r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ha/ve__vbmod">
  <e>       <p><l>ve</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>ving</l>      <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>ving</l>      <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>ving</l>      <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ve</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>st</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>th</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dst</l>       <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ha/ve__vbhaver">
  <e>       <p><l>ve</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ve</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>d</l>         <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>ving</l>      <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>ving</l>      <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>ving</l>      <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ve</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>st</l>        <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dst</l>       <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="III">             <i>III</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
<e lm="IV">              <i>IV</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
<e lm="IX">              <i>IX</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
<e lm="V">               <i>V</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
<e lm="VI">              <i>VI</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
<e lm="VII">             <i>VII</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
<e lm="VIII">            <i>VIII</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
<e lm="X">               <i>X</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
<e lm="XI">              <i>XI</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
<e lm="XII">             <i>XII</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
<e lm="XIV">             <i>XIV</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
<e lm="XV">              <i>XV</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
<e lm="XVII">            <i>XVII</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
<e lm="XX">              <i>XX</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
<e lm="XXII">            <i>XXII</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
<e lm="a hundred">       <i>a<b/>hundred</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
<e lm="a thousand">      <i>a<b/>thousand</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
<e lm="eighty">          <i>eighty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="eighty-eight">    <i>eighty-eight</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="eighty-four">     <i>eighty-four</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="eighty-one">      <i>eighty-one</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="eighty-six">      <i>eighty-six</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="eighty-two">      <i>eighty-two</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="fifteen">         <i>fifteen</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="fifty">           <i>fifty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="fifty-nine">      <i>fifty-nine</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="fifty-three">     <i>fifty-three</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="forty">           <i>forty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="fourteen">        <i>fourteen</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="million">         <i>million</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
<e lm="ninety">          <i>ninety</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="ninety-eight">    <i>ninety-eight</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="ninety-one">      <i>ninety-one</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="ninety-two">      <i>ninety-two</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="one">             <i>one</i><par n="one__num"/></e>
<e lm="one hundred">     <i>one<b/>hundred</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
<e lm="one thousand">    <i>one<b/>thousand</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
<e lm="seventy">         <i>seventy</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="seventy-five">    <i>seventy-five</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="seventy-seven">   <i>seventy-seven</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="six">             <i>six</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="sixty">           <i>sixty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="sixty-four">      <i>sixty-four</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="sixty-six">       <i>sixty-six</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="thirteen">        <i>thirteen</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="thirty">          <i>thirty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="twenty">          <i>twenty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="twenty-eight">    <i>twenty-eight</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="twenty-one">      <i>twenty-one</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="twenty-two">      <i>twenty-two</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="zero">            <i>zero</i><par n="one__num"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="be able to"><i></i><par n="/be_able_to__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="must">            <i></i><par n="/must__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="must not">        <i></i><par n="/must__vbmod"/><p><l><b/>not</l><r><g><b/>not</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="can">             <i>c</i><par n="c/an__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="have to">         <i>ha</i><par n="ha/ve__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="have to">         <i>ha</i><par n="ha/ve__vbmod"/><p><l><b/>to</l><r><g><b/>to</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="may">             <i>may</i><par n="must__vbmod"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="mayest">   <p><l>mayest</l>    <r>may</r></p><par n="must__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="might">           <i>might</i><par n="must__vbmod"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="mightst">  <p><l>mightst</l>   <r>might</r></p><par n="must__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="shall">           <i>sh</i><par n="sh/all__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="will">            <i>w</i><par n="w/ill__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="want to">         <i>want</i><par n="want__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="want to">         <i>want</i><par n="want__vbmod"/><p><l><b/>to</l><r><g><b/>to</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="have">            <i>ha</i><par n="ha/ve__vbhaver"/></e>
